Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-6,355
All-terrain vehicle, defined; utility-type vehicle, defined.

(1) For purposes of sections 60-6,355 to 60-6,362:

(a) All-terrain vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle which (i) is fifty inches or less in width, (ii) travels on three or more nonhighway tires, and (iii) is designed for operator use only with no passengers or is specifically designed by the original manufacturer for the operator and one passenger.

(b)(i) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle which (A) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (B) is not more than one hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, and (C) travels on four or more nonhighway tires.

(ii) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf car vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.

(2) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles which have been modified or retrofitted with after-market parts to include additional equipment not required by sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358 shall not be registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, nor shall such modified or retrofitted vehicles be eligible for registration in any other category of vehicle defined in the act.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2801;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 451;

Laws 2003, LB 333, § 33;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 250;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 39;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 24;

Laws 2013, LB223, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB814, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB98, § 5.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.